Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1722.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(a) of the act of September 30, 1983 (P.L.160, No.39), known as the Public Official Compensation Law, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 3. Compensation of Governor and Lieutenant Governor; State Treasurer; Auditor General; Attorney General; Commissioners of the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission; and heads of departments.123456789101112131415161718192021222324 (a) The Governor, the Lieutenant Governor and Cabinet.--The annual salaries of the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor and the heads of the departments shall be as follows: Governor, $125,000; Lieutenant Governor, $105,000; Adjutant General, $90,000; Secretary of Aging, $95,000; Secretary of Agriculture, $90,000; Secretary of Banking and Securities, $90,000; Secretary of Community and Economic Development, $95,000; Secretary of the Commonwealth, $90,000; Secretary of Education, $100,000; Secretary of Environmental Protection, $100,000; Secretary of General Services, $95,000; Secretary of Health, $100,000; Insurance Commissioner, $90,000; Secretary of Labor and Industry, $100,000; Secretary of [Public Welfare] Human Services, $100,000; Secretary of Revenue, $95,000; [State Police Commissioner, $95,000;] Secretary of Transportation, $100,000; Secretary of Corrections, $100,000; Secretary of Conservation and Natural Resources, $95,000.* * *(d.1) Compensation of State Police Commissioner.--The State Police Commissioner shall receive an annual salary commensurate with the annual salary received by the Secretary of Corrections.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1722PN2122 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122